Utah statutes.
4-24-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Brand" means any identifiable mark applied to livestock which is
intended to show ownership.
(2)  "Carcass" means any part of the body of an animal, including hides,
entrails, and edible meats.
(3)  "Domesticated elk" shall have the meaning as defined in Section 4-39-102.
(4)  "Hide" means any skins or wool removed from livestock.
(5)  "Livestock" means cattle, calves, horses, mules, sheep, goats, hogs, or
domesticated elk.
(6) (a)  "Livestock market" means a public market place consisting of pens or
other enclosures where cattle, calves, horses, or mules are received on
consignment and kept for subsequent sale, either through public auction or
private sale.
(b)  "Livestock market" does not mean:
(i)  a place used solely for liquidation of livestock by a farmer, dairyman,
livestock breeder, or feeder who is going out of business; or
(ii)  a place where an association of livestock breeders under its own
management, offers registered livestock or breeding sires for sale and assumes
all responsibility for the sale, guarantees title to the livestock or sires
sold, and arranges with the department for brand inspection of all animals
sold.
(7)  "Mark" means any dulap, waddle, or cutting and shaping of the ears or
brisket area of livestock which is intended to show ownership.
(8)  "Slaughterhouse" means any building, plant, or establishment where
animals are killed, dressed, or processed and their meat or meat products
offered for sale for human consumption.
